Utah statutes.
13-25a-107.2.   Requests to a specific telephone solicitor.
(1)  A telephone solicitor may not make or cause to be made a telephone
solicitation to a person who has informed the telephone solicitor, either in
writing or orally, that the person does not wish to receive a telephone call
from the telephone solicitor.
(2)  A telephone solicitor is not liable for a violation of this section if
the telephone solicitor complies with 16 C.F.R. Part 310.4(b)(3) and (4).
